src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_75JÄRÄMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ järämä:järä
!! * Yaml: __V-jaeraemae75__
+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_iäq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:%^Pen%^StrGStem FRONT_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V:%^VowRM%>e FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^VowRM%>e FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_76HIGOMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ higoma:higo
!! * Yaml: __V-higoma76__
!+V:%^Pen%^WGStem BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
!+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
!+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
!+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_iaq ;
!+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;
!
!+V:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
!+V:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG1_iõ ;
!+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
!+V:%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
!+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;
!
!+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
!+V:%^StrGStem BACK_INF_ZEROq ;
!+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
!+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_nuq ;
!+V:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>õ BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;!CHECKME
!+V:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>õ BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
+V: V0_76LUGÕMA ;

LEXICON V0_76LUGÕMA
!! Retain consonant and stem vowel
: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v_LUGÕMA ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) lugõma
!! +Act+PrsPrc+Sg OBL, Inf/mA, 
!! +Jus


!! Strengthen consonant retain stem vowel
:%^Pen%^StrGStem BACK_INF_ZEROq ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) lukõq
:%^Pen%^StrGStem BACK_ACT-PRSPRC-SG-NOM_v ; !!= * @CODE@ (2b) lukõv
!! Inf, Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom

!! Retain consonant and stem vowel
: BACK_ACT-PRFPRC_v_LUGÕMA ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) lugõnuq
!! +Act+PrfPrc

!! Weaken consonant and semi-retension of stem vowel
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^Õ2E BACK_LUGÕMA_PSS-PRC ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) loet
!! Pss+PrfPrc, Pss+PrsPrc

!! Weaken consonant and semi-retension of stem vowel
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^Õ2E BACK_LUGÕMA_IND-CONNEGII ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) loet
!! Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1/Sg2/Pl1/Pl2, Ind+ConNegII, Ind+Prs+ConNeg
!! Pss+Ind

!! Retain consonant and stem vowel
: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-3_LUGÕMA ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) lugõma
!! Ind+Prs+ 3

!! Weaken consonant and replace stem vowel with i
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>i BACK_LOGÕMA_ACT-IND-PRT-SG1 ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) loi
!! Act+Ind+PrtSg1/Sg2/Pl1-3

!! Retain consonant remove stem vowel and add i
:%^VowRM%>i BACK_LUGÕMA_IND-PRT-SG3 ; !!= * @CODE@ (8) lugi
!! Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3



LEXICON V_76PÜGÄMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ pügämä:pügä
!! * Yaml: __V-puegaemae76__
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_iäq ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^VOWLower%^WGStem%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V:%^VOWLower%^WGStem%^VowRM FRONT_IND-PRT-SCSG1_ie ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:%^StrGStem FRONT_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_nüq ;
+V:%^VOWLower%^WGStem%^VowRM%>e FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^VOWLower%^WGStem%^VowRM%>e FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_77JUUMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ juuma:juu
!! * Yaml: __juuma__
+V: BACK_INF_ma ; !!= * @CODE@ juu
+V:d%^WGStem BACK_INF_aq ; !!= * @CODE@ juvv

+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ juu
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ juut
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>dõq BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ juudõq
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ juu
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tiq BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ juutiq
+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>dõq BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ juudõq
+V+Act+Ind+ConNegII: BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ juu

+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^VOWLower%>sõ BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ joosõ
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%^VOWLower%>miq BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ joomiq
+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%^VOWLower%>vaq BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ joovaq

+V:d%^WGStem%>a BACK_JUVVA_PSS-IND-PRS ; !!= * @CODE@ juvva

!!These must be fixed 2015-06-09
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sei BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: seie BACK_K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: seit BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: seiet BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: seiq BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: seieq BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: seideq BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: seiedeq BACK_K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sei BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: seie BACK_K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: seimiq BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: seiemiq BACK_K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: seitiq BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: seietiq BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: seideq BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: seiedeq BACK_K ;
!+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: seiq BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: seieq BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: seiväq BACK_K ;
!+Use/NG+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: seieväq BACK_K ;


+V:d%^WGStem BACK_IND-PRT-OC1-2_i ; !!= * @CODE@ juvv

+V:d BACK_IND-PRT-OC3_i ; !!= * @CODE@ juud

+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_va ; !!= * @CODE@ juu

+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_dav ; !!= * @CODE@ juu

+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom:%^VOWLower%>nuq BACK_K ; !!= * @CODE@ joonuq

+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC-OBL_nu ; !!= * @CODE@ juu

+V: BACK_JUUMA-PSS-PRF-PRC_d ; !!≈ * @CODE@ juu
!!

+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ; !!≈ * @CODE@ juu, juut, 
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:%^VOWLower BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_sõ ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^UU2Õ BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG1_iõ ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:õ BACK_K ;

+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SCSG3_iõ ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_vaq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^VOWLower BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
