src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
hagõma:hagõma V_76HIGOMA  "" ;
higoma:higo V_76HIGOMA  "" ;
jagama:jaga V_76HIGOMA  "" ;
juuma:juu V_77JUUMA  "" ;
järämä:järä V_75JÄRÄMÄ  "" ;
jürämä:jürä V_75JÄRÄMÄ  "" ;
kjauma:kjau V_77JUUMA  "" ;
kudama:kuda V_76HIGOMA  "" ;
kʼauma:kʼau V_77JUUMA  "" ;
lugõma:lugõ V_76HIGOMA  "" ;
luuma:luu V_77JUUMA  "" ;
pidämä:pidä V_76PÜGÄMÄ  "" ;
puuma:puu V_77JUUMA  "" ;
põdõma:põdõ V_76HIGOMA  "" ;
pügämä:pügä V_76PÜGÄMÄ  "" ;
ragoma:rago V_76HIGOMA  "" ;
sugima:sugi V_76HIGOMA  "" ;
tsagama:tsaga V_76HIGOMA  "" ;
tuuma:tuu V_77JUUMA  "" ;
vidämä:vidä V_76PÜGÄMÄ  "" ;
